Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-303 Authority to offer death, sick,
disability, or other benefits; conditions. (a) Each society promising or
offering to pay death, sick, disability, or other benefits in an amount equal
to or in excess of $25 may solicit members for the purpose of completing its
organization upon receipt from the commissioner of the certificate of
registration required in section 432:1-301, and may collect from each applicant
the amount of not more than one regular monthly payment and shall issue to each
applicant a receipt for the amount so collected.

(b) Except as hereinafter provided, no society
shall incur any liability other than for the advance payments, nor issue any
benefit certificate, nor allow, or offer or promise to pay, or allow to any
person any death benefit until:

(1) Actual bona fide applications for death
certificates have been secured upon at least one hundred lives for at least $25
each, and all the applicants for death benefits have been regularly examined by
a qualified practicing physician, and certificates of the examination have been
duly filed with and approved by the administrative board or body of the
society; and

(2) At least one hundred applicants have been
accepted for membership; and

(3) There has been submitted to the commissioner,
under oath of the president and secretary, or corresponding officers of the
society, a list of applicants including the following information about each
applicant:

(A) Name and address,

(B) Date examined,

(C) Date of approval,

(D) Date accepted as member,

(E) If subordinate branches have been
established, the name and number of the subordinate branch of which each
applicant is a member,

(F) Amount of benefits to be granted, and

(G) The rate of stated periodical
contributions which shall be sufficient to provide for meeting the mortuary
obligations contracted when valued for death purposes upon the basis of a
recognized table of mortality or any mutual benefit standard based on at least
twenty years' experience, and for disability benefits by tables based upon
reliable experience, and for combined death and permanent total disability
benefits by tables based upon reliable experience; and

(4) It has been shown to the commissioner by the
sworn statement of the treasurer or corresponding officer of the society that
at least one hundred applicants have paid in cash at least one regular monthly
payment as provided under subsection (a), which payments in the aggregate shall
amount to at least five times the maximum amount of death benefit offered or
promised to be paid to any one member.

(c) If the society does not offer or promise
to pay any death benefits in excess of $25 upon the death of a member, but
merely offers or promises to pay disability benefits by reason of sickness or
injury, or to pay any other benefits, with or without provision of death
benefit in excess of $25, the society shall apply for a certificate of
authority from the commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 251, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next